src-fst-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# South Sámi nouns 
## The lexicon `NounRoot`

This lexicon is the start of all noun lemmas. It splits the nouns in three
classes as follows:

NounRoot --> FirstComponent
NounRoot --> HyphNouns
NounRoot --> Noun

# All nouns with possessives

## **LEXICON Noun**
Splitting nouns in NounNoPx, NounPx (with a P.Px.add
flag) and NounPxKin (with a P.Nom3Px.add flag)
* **NounNoPx ;** = words in this noun lexicon do not get any possessive inflectionb
* **@P.Px.add@ NounPx ;** = these nouns do get possessive inflection, except for 3. person nominative, which is usually only used with kinship terms (see next)
* **@P.Px.add@ NounPxKin ;** = these nouns get full possessive inflection, including 3. person nominative - except that the 3. person nominative has been removed in the South Sámi description. The reason for that change needs to be documented here.

Not according to umlautsystem

---Ije-

Lemma fra GG: merk DNorm

pp, tt, kk --> hp, ht, hk   eller bp, dt, gk?  bp, dt, gk strider i mot rettskrivingsprinsippene jfr.

https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Huksenteknihkka:borettslaghttps://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Huksenteknihkka:frittstående_borettslag
https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Education:embetsstudium
https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Huksenteknihkka:borettslaghttps://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Huksenteknihkka:frittstående_borettslag

6 koreen
5 tyrkijen
20 Bottleneck-hypotesen       ---- dynamisk sammensetning - how?
17 direkte

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
